Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.210

Violation of chapter—Procedure.

The director may refer a complaint for violation of any section of this chapter before any court of competent jurisdiction.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be prosecuted by the prosecuting attorney of each county in which the violation occurs, and if the prosecuting attorney fails to act, the director may request the attorney general to take action in lieu of the prosecuting attorney.

Whenever evidence satisfactory to the director suggests that any person has violated any of the provisions of this chapter, or any part or provision thereof, the director may bring an action, in the superior court in the county where the person resides, against the person to enjoin any person from continuing a violation or engaging or doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof. In this action an order or judgment may be entered awarding a preliminary or final injunction as may be proper.

The director may petition the superior court in any county in this state for the appointment of a receiver to take over, operate, or close any real estate appraisal activity or practice in this state which is found upon inspection of its books and records to be operating in violation of the provisions of this chapter, pending a hearing.

[ 1996 c 182 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.